Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 8 Central Child Abuse Registry

49-5-180 through 49-5-187.
[Reserved]

History.

Code 1981, §§

49-5-180

through 49-5-183, 49-5-183.1, and 49-5-184 through 49-5-187; Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 11/SB 138; Ga. L. 2016, p. 773, § 8/HB 905; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 49/HB 737; Ga. L. 2017, p. 345, § 2/SB 168; Ga. L. 2019, p. 770, §§ 1-4/HB 478; repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 181, § 7/HB 993, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 11/SB 138, effective July 1, 2015, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at Title 49, Chapter 5, Article 8 and enacted a different Title 49, Chapter 5, Article 8. The former Title 49, Chapter 5, Article 8 consisted of Code Sections 49-5-180 through 49-5-183, 49-5-183.1, and 49-5-184 through 49-5-187, relating to the central child abuse registry, and was based on Ga. L. 1990, p. 1772, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1320, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 937, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1143, §§ 2, 3 and 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49; Ga. L. 1998, p. 609, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 93/HB 24; Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 20/HB 349.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, the amendment of Code Section 49-5-184 by Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 49/SB 429 was not given effect as the provisions of Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 54(e)/SB 429, provided that: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2020 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.”